South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S582.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Voter qualifications revised SECTION 1.    The amendment to Section 4, Article II of the Constitution of South Carolina, 1895, prepared under the terms of Joint Resolution 1126 of 2024, having been submitted to the qualified electors at the General Election of 2024 as prescribed in Section 1, Article XVI of the Constitution of South Carolina, 1895, and a favorable vote having been received on the amendment, is ratified and declared to be a part of the Constitution so that Section 4, Article II of the Constitution of this State be amended to read: "Section 4. Only a citizen of the United States and of this State of the age of eighteen and upwards who is properly registered is entitled to vote as provided by law." Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. __________